Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1085.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Good Jobs for Quality Care Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Board." The Direct Care Worker Wage Advisory Board established under section 3(a)."Department." The Department of Human Services of the Commonwealth."Direct care worker." An individual employed in long-term 123456789101112131415161718 care in a home setting, a community-based facility or a nursing home providing hands-on care, services and support to elderly individuals and individuals with disabilities. The term includes the following:(1) Personal care aides.(2) Home health aides.(3) Nursing assistants.(4) Certified nursing assistants.(5) Attendants.(6) Assisted living aides.(7) Home health aides.(8) Home care aides.(9) Nurse aides.(10) Program assistants."Direct care worker organization." An organization that represents direct care workers, in which direct care workers participate and that exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, rates of pay, hours of employment or conditions of work. The term does not include labor organizations that, by ritualistic practice, constitutional or bylaw proscription, by tacit agreement among its members, or otherwise, denies a person membership in its organization on account of race, creed, color or political affiliation."Employer." A person who employs a direct care worker."Secretary." The Secretary of Human Services of the Commonwealth."Wage." Compensation for a direct care worker by reason of the direct care worker's employment payable in legal tender of the United States or checks on banks convertible into cash on 20250SB1085PN1353 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 demand at full face value, subject to deductions, charges or allowances as may be permitted by regulations of the secretary under this act.Section 3. Direct Care Worker Wage Advisory Board.(a) Establishment.--The Direct Care Worker Wage Advisory Board is established within the department to examine challenges to recruiting and retaining direct care workers, including compensation, work schedules and other working conditions, and to recommend regulations for the industry.(b) Composition of board.--The board shall consist of the following members:(1) The secretary, or a representative of the secretary.(2) The Secretary of Labor and Industry, or a representative of the Secretary of Labor and Industry.(3) The following members, who must be residents of this Commonwealth, appointed by the secretary:(i) One member who represents an established, recognized direct care worker organization.(ii) One member who is a direct care worker at a nursing home.(iii) One member who is a direct care worker employed as a home care services provider.(iv) One member who is a nursing home employer.(v) One member who is a home care employer.(vi) One member who represents the interests of individuals receiving direct care worker services.(vii) One member who represents providers of direct care workforce development and training for direct care workers.(c) Recommendations.--The secretary shall solicit 20250SB1085PN1353 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 recommendations of qualified individuals for board membership from any source, including a direct care worker organization that maintains a membership of at least 1,000 members. If the secretary does not receive a sufficient number of recommendations, the secretary may appoint any remaining positions on the board, in any combination, from the following:(1) An employer.(2) A labor organization that represents the interests of direct care workers.(3) A representative of a direct care facility or other facility that is responsible for individuals receiving long-term care services.(d) Term.--A board member appointed under subsection (b)(1) or (2) shall serve a term concurrent with the member's term of office or concurrent with the term of office of the member's appointing official. A board member appointed under subsection (b)(3) shall serve a term of two years and until a successor is appointed. A member of the board may be reappointed. After the appointment of the initial board members, successor board members under subsection (b)(3) shall be appointed by a majority vote of the board members, before the expiration of the term of a member, but not later than January 1 of each even-numbered year.Section 4. Powers and duties of board.(a) Specific duties.--The board shall:(1) Consult with the secretary and make findings regarding factors that may contribute to a shortage of skilled direct care workers, including:(i) Compensation rates.(ii) Lack of health care benefits or other paid 20250SB1085PN1353 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 benefits, including paid family leave, sick leave or retirement benefits.(2) Make recommendations regarding:(i) A compensation schedule for direct care workers and increases to the hourly minimum wage paid to direct care workers.(ii) Uniform standards for training and education for direct care workers.(iii) Improvements to working conditions, including work schedules and workplace standards relating to safety.(3) Submit to the General Assembly no later than December 31 of each year a report that includes the findings and recommendations of the board. The board shall include in the annual report the recommended compensation schedule described in paragraph (2)(i).(4) Receive complaints from direct care workers and refer complaints to the appropriate State agency or law enforcement agency.(b) Public meetings.--The meetings of the board shall be open to the public under 65 Pa.C.S. § 704 (relating to open meetings).(c) Advisors.--The board may employ a professional researcher to serve in an advisory capacity to the board. The board may employ and compensate employees and other advisors as the board deems necessary and appropriate.(d) Compensation and expenses.--(1) Except for the members under section 3(b)(1) and (2), members of the board shall receive compensation as the secretary determines is necessary and shall be reimbursed for 20250SB1085PN1353 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reasonable expenses incurred in the exercise of board duties.(2) An employer who serves as a member of the board shall grant reasonable leave to the worker to participate in board activities without loss of compensation.(3) An employer may not penalize or retaliate against a direct care worker because of the worker's participation in any of the activities of the board.(4) The secretary may assess a civil penalty in an amount determined by the secretary against an employer who violates this subsection. Money collected as penalties under this paragraph shall be paid to the department to reimburse the board for the costs incurred by the board in performing its duties.Section 5. Minimum wage.(a) Duty of secretary to establish rate.--Upon consideration of the compensation schedule submitted under section 4(a)(3), the secretary shall establish by regulation a minimum wage rate at which direct care workers shall be paid, provided that the rate established by the secretary is not less than the hourly minimum wage rate that is required under the act of January 17, 1968 (P.L.11, No.5), known as The Minimum Wage Act of 1968.(b) Limitation.--Once the minimum wage rate is established under subsection (a), the rate may not be lowered unless approved by a unanimous vote of the board.(c) Penalties.--An employer who fails to pay the minimum wage rate established under subsection (a) shall be subject to a fine of $1,000 for the first violation, $5,000 for the second violation and $10,000 for each subsequent violation to be assessed by the department.(d) Civil actions.--If a direct care worker is paid by the 20250SB1085PN1353 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 employer less than the minimum wage rate established in subsection (a), the direct care worker may recover in a civil action the full amount of the minimum wage rate, less any amount actually paid to the worker by the employer, together with costs and reasonable attorney fees as may be allowed by the court.Section 6. Registry.(a) Registry.--The board shall create a registry of direct care workers in this Commonwealth. An employer shall provide quarterly to the registry contact information for the direct care worker and the direct care worker's workplace, including a telephone number and email address, and other information as determined by the board.(b) Registry access.--(1) The registry shall only be available to direct care worker organizations. A direct care worker organization and direct care workers are permitted to communicate for purposes of the registry.(2) It is a violation for an employer to not permit communication between a direct care worker organization and direct care workers under paragraph (1).(3) Registry information shall be exempt from access under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(4) For a violation of this subsection, the department may assess a penalty of $1,000 for the first violation, $5,000 for the second violation and $10,000 for each subsequent violation.Section 7. Voluntary deduction of dues.(a) Duty of employer and direct care worker organization.--(1) Not later than 30 days after receipt of a written 20250SB1085PN1353 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 request of a direct care worker to make deductions from the direct care worker's paycheck and remit the deductions to the direct care worker organization, the employer shall comply with the request.(2) A direct care worker organization shall provide any necessary information to the employer in order to receive paycheck deductions from an employer.(b) Violations.--An employer who fails to comply with subsection (a) shall be subject to a fine of $1,000 for a first violation, $5,000 for a second violation and $10,000 for each subsequent violation, to be assessed by the department.Section 8. Regulations.The department may promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to administer and enforce this act.Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB1085PN1353 - 8 - 12345678910111213141516